Alaska statutes. Title 13. Decedents’ Estates, Guardianships, Transfers, Trusts, and Health Care Decisions.
Article 7. Duties and Powers of Personal Representatives.

Sec. 13.16.340.
Time of accrual of duties and powers.

The duties and powers of a personal representative commence upon appointment.
The powers of a personal representative relate back in time to give acts by the person appointed that are beneficial to the estate occurring prior to appointment the same effect as those occurring thereafter.
Prior to appointment, a person named executor in a will may carry out written instructions of the decedent relating to the decedent’s body, funeral, and burial arrangements.
A personal representative may ratify and accept acts on behalf of the estate done by others where the acts would have been proper for a personal representative.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Sec. 13.16.345.
Priority among different letters.

A person to whom general letters are issued first has exclusive authority under the letters until the appointment is terminated or modified.
If, through error, general letters are afterwards issued to another, the first appointed representative may recover any property of the estate in the hands of the representative subsequently appointed, but the acts of the latter done in good faith before notice of the first letters are not void for want of validity of appointment.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Sec. 13.16.350.
General duties; standard of care; relation and liability to persons interested in estate; standing to sue.

A personal representative is a fiduciary who shall observe the standards of care applicable to trustees under AS

13.36.225

—

13.36.290

. A personal representative is under a duty to settle and distribute the estate of the decedent in accordance with the terms of any probated and effective will and AS 13.06 — AS 13.36, and as expeditiously and efficiently as is consistent with the best interests of the estate. A personal representative shall use the authority conferred by AS 13.06 — AS 13.36, the terms of the will, if any, and any order in proceedings to which the personal representative is party for the best interests of successors to the estate.

A personal representative may not be surcharged for acts of administration or distribution if the conduct in question was authorized at the time. Subject to other obligations of administration, an informally probated will is authority to administer and distribute the estate according to its terms. An order of appointment of a personal representative, whether issued in informal or formal proceedings, is authority to distribute apparently intestate assets to the heirs of the decedent if, at the time of distribution, the personal representative is not aware of a pending testacy proceeding, a proceeding to vacate an order entered in an earlier testacy proceeding, a formal proceeding questioning the appointment or fitness to continue, or a supervised administration proceeding. Nothing in this section affects the duty of the personal representative to administer and distribute the estate in accordance with the rights of claimants, the surviving spouse, any minor and dependent children and any pretermitted child of the decedent as described elsewhere in AS 13.06 — AS 13.36.

Except as to proceedings that do not survive the death of the decedent, a personal representative of a decedent domiciled in this state at death has the same standing to sue and be sued in the courts of this state and the courts of any other jurisdiction as the decedent had immediately before death.

History.

(§ 1 ch 75 SLA 1972; am § 1 ch 43 SLA 1998)

Revisor’s notes. —

The reference to “AS

13.36.225

—

13.36.290

” was substituted for “AS 13.36.200 —

13.36.275

” in subsection (a) in 1998 to reflect the 1998 renumbering of those sections.

Sec. 13.16.355.
Personal representative to proceed without court order; exception.

A personal representative shall proceed expeditiously with the settlement and distribution of a decedent’s estate and, except as otherwise specified or ordered in regard to a supervised personal representative, do so without adjudication, order, or direction of the court, but the personal representative may invoke the jurisdiction of the court, in proceedings authorized by AS 13.06
—
AS 13.36, to resolve questions concerning the estate or its administration.

History.

(§ 1 ch 75 SLA 1972)

Sec. 13.16.360.
Duty of personal representative; information to heirs and devisees.

Not later than 30 days after appointment, every personal representative, except any special administrator, shall give information of the appointment to the heirs and devisees, including, if there has been no formal testacy proceeding and if the personal representative was appointed on the assumption that the decedent died intestate, the devisees in any will mentioned in the application for appointment of a personal representative. The information shall be delivered or sent by ordinary mail to each of the heirs and devisees whose address is reasonably available to the personal representative. The duty does not extend to require information to persons who have been adjudicated in a prior formal testacy proceeding to have no interest in the estate.
The information must include the name and address of the personal representative, indicate that it is being sent to persons who have or may have some interest in the estate being administered, indicate whether bond has been filed, and describe the court where papers relating to the estate are on file.
The personal representative’s failure to give this information is a breach of duty to the persons concerned but does not affect the validity of the appointment, the personal representative’s powers or other duties.
A personal representative may inform other persons of the appointment by delivery or ordinary first-class mail.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Sec. 13.16.365.
Duty of personal representative; inventory and appraisal.

Within three months after appointment, a personal representative, who is not a special administrator or a successor to another representative who has previously discharged this duty, shall prepare and file or mail an inventory of property owned by the decedent at the time of death, listing it with reasonable detail, and indicating as to each listed item, its fair market value as of the date of the decedent’s death, and the type and amount of any encumbrance that may exist with reference to any item.

The personal representative shall send a copy of the inventory to interested persons who request it. The personal representative may also file the original of the inventory with the court.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972; am § 14 ch 154 SLA 1976)

Sec. 13.16.370.
Employment of appraisers.

The personal representative may employ a qualified and disinterested appraiser to assist in ascertaining the fair market value as of the date of the decedent’s death of any asset the value of which may be subject to reasonable doubt. Different persons may be employed to appraise different kinds of assets included in the estate. The names and addresses of any appraiser shall be indicated on the inventory with the item or items appraised.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Sec. 13.16.375.
Duty of personal representative; supplementary inventory.

If any property not included in the original inventory comes to the knowledge of a personal representative or if the personal representative learns that the value or description indicated in the original inventory for any item is erroneous or misleading, the personal representative shall make a supplementary inventory or appraisal showing the market value as of the date of the decedent’s death of the new item or the revised market value or descriptions, and the appraisers or other data relied upon, if any, and file it with the court if the original inventory was filed, or furnish copies of it or information on it to persons interested in the new information.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2010, “appraisal” was substituted for “appraisement” to correct a manifest error in ch. 78, SLA 1972.

Sec. 13.16.380.
Duty of personal representative; possession of estate.

Except as otherwise provided by a decedent’s will, every personal representative has a right to, and shall take possession or control of, the decedent’s property, except that any real property or tangible personal property may be left with or surrendered to the person presumptively entitled to it unless or until, in the judgment of the personal representative, possession of the property by the personal representative will be necessary for purposes of administration.
The request by a personal representative for delivery of any property possessed by an heir or devisee is conclusive evidence, in any action against the heir or devisee for possession of it, that the possession of the property by the personal representative is necessary for purposes of administration.
The personal representative shall pay taxes on, and take all steps reasonably necessary for the management, protection, and preservation of, the estate in the personal representative’s possession.
The personal representative may maintain an action to recover possession of property or to determine the title to it.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Sec. 13.16.381.
Disposition of unclaimed estate by personal representative.

When there is no taker of an intestate estate, or if an heir, devisee, or claimant cannot be found and the missing person has no conservator, the personal representative shall handle the

unclaimed personal property of the estate in accordance with AS

34.45.280

—

34.45.780

; and

unclaimed real property of the estate in accordance with AS 38.95.

History.

(§ 6 ch 133 SLA 1986)

Revisor’s notes. —

“AS 38.95” was substituted for “AS 38.05” at the end of the section in 1987 to correct a manifest error in the original enactment.

Sec. 13.16.385.
Power to avoid transfers.

The property liable for the payment of unsecured debts of a decedent includes all property transferred by the decedent by any means that is in law void or voidable as against creditors, and subject to prior liens, the right to recover this property, so far as necessary for the payment of unsecured debts of the decedent, is exclusively in the personal representative.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Sec. 13.16.390.
Powers of personal representatives; in general.

Until termination of appointment, a personal representative has the same power over the title to property of the estate that an absolute owner would have, in trust however, for the benefit of the creditors and others interested in the estate. This power may be exercised without notice, hearing, or order of court.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Sec. 13.16.395.
Improper exercise of power; breach of fiduciary duty.

If the exercise of power concerning the estate is improper, the personal representative is liable to interested persons for damage or loss resulting from breach of fiduciary duty to the same extent as a trustee of an express trust.
The rights of purchasers and others dealing with a personal representative shall be determined as provided in AS

13.16.400

and

13.16.405

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Sec. 13.16.400.
Sale, encumbrance, or transaction involving conflict of interest voidable; exceptions.

Any sale or encumbrance to the personal representative, the personal representative’s spouse, agent, or attorney, or any corporation or trust in which the personal representative has a substantial beneficial interest, or any transaction that is affected by a substantial conflict of interest on the part of the personal representative, is voidable by any person interested in the estate except one who has consented after fair disclosure, unless

the will or a contract entered into by the decedent expressly authorized the transaction; or

the transaction is approved by the court after notice to interested persons.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Sec. 13.16.405.
Persons dealing with personal representative; protection.

A person who in good faith either assists a personal representative or deals with the personal representative for value is protected as if the personal representative properly exercised the personal representative’s power.
The fact that a person knowingly deals with a personal representative does not alone require the person to inquire into the existence of a power or the propriety of its exercise.
Except for restrictions on powers of supervised personal representatives which are endorsed on letters as provided in AS

13.16.230

, no provision in any will or order of court purporting to limit the power of a personal representative is effective except as to persons with actual knowledge of it.
A person is not bound to see to the proper application of estate assets paid or delivered to a personal representative.
The protection here expressed extends to instances in which some procedural irregularity or jurisdictional defect occurred in proceedings leading to the issuance of letters, including a case in which the alleged decedent is found to be alive.
The protection here expressed is not by substitution for that provided by comparable provisions of the laws relating to commercial transactions and laws simplifying transfers of securities by fiduciaries.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Collateral references. —

37 Am. Jur. 2d, Fraudulent Conveyances, § 121.

Sec. 13.16.410.
Transactions authorized for personal representatives; exceptions.

Except as restricted or otherwise provided by the will or by an order in a formal proceeding and subject to the priorities stated in AS

13.16.540

, a personal representative, acting reasonably for the benefit of the interested persons, may properly

retain assets owned by the decedent pending distribution or liquidation, including those in which the representative is personally interested or that are otherwise improper for trust investment;

receive assets from fiduciaries, or other sources;

perform, compromise, or refuse performance of the decedent’s contracts that continue as obligations of the estate, as the personal representative may determine under the circumstances; in performing enforceable contracts by the decedent to convey or lease land, the personal representative, among other possible courses of action, may:

execute and deliver a deed of conveyance for cash payment of all sums remaining due or the purchaser’s note for the sum remaining due secured by a mortgage or deed of trust on the land; or

deliver a deed in escrow with directions that the proceeds, when paid in accordance with the escrow agreement, be paid to the successors of the decedent, as designated in the escrow agreement;

satisfy written charitable pledges of the decedent irrespective of whether the pledges constituted binding obligations of the decedent or were properly presented as claims, if in the judgment of the personal representative the decedent would have wanted the pledges completed under the circumstances;

if funds are not needed to meet debts and expenses currently payable and are not immediately distributable, deposit or invest liquid assets of the estate, including money received from the sale of other assets, in federally insured interest-bearing accounts, readily marketable secured loan arrangements, or other prudent investments which would be reasonable for use by trustees generally;

acquire or dispose of an asset, including land in this or another state, for cash or on credit, at public or private sale; and manage, develop, improve, exchange, partition, change the character of, or abandon an estate asset;

make ordinary or extraordinary repairs or alterations in buildings or other structures, demolish any improvements, raze existing or erect new party walls or buildings;

subdivide, develop or dedicate land to public use; make or obtain the vacation of plats and adjust boundaries; or adjust differences in valuation on exchange or partition by giving or receiving considerations; or dedicate easements to public use without consideration;

enter for any purpose into a lease as lessor or lessee, with or without option to purchase or renew, for a term within or extending beyond the period of administration;

enter into a lease or arrangement for exploration and removal of minerals or other natural resources or enter into a pooling or unitization agreement;

abandon property when, in the opinion of the personal representative, it is valueless, or is so encumbered, or is in condition that it is of no benefit to the estate;

vote stocks or other securities in person or by general or limited proxy;

pay calls, assessment, and other sums chargeable or accruing against or on account of securities, unless barred by the provisions relating to claims;

hold a security in the name of a nominee or in other form without disclosure of the interest of the estate, but the personal representative is liable for any act of the nominee in connection with the security so held;

insure the assets of the estate against damage, loss, and liability and insure the personal representative against liability as to third persons;

borrow money with or without security to be repaid from the estate assets or otherwise; and advance money for the protection of the estate;

effect a fair and reasonable compromise with any debtor or obligor, or extend, renew, or in any manner modify the terms of any obligation owing to the estate; if the personal representative holds a mortgage, pledge, or other lien upon property of another person, the personal representative may, in place of foreclosure, accept a conveyance or transfer of encumbered assets from the owner of it in satisfaction of the indebtedness secured by lien;

pay taxes, assessments, compensation of the personal representative, and other expenses incident to the administration of the estate;

sell or exercise stock subscription or conversion rights; consent, directly or through a committee or other agent, to the reorganization, consolidation, merger, dissolution, or liquidation of a corporation or other business enterprise;

allocate items of income or expense to either estate income or principal, as permitted or provided by law;

employ persons, including attorneys, auditors, investment advisors, or agents, even if they are associated with the personal representative, to advise or assist the personal representative in the performance of administrative duties; act without independent investigation upon their recommendations; and instead of acting personally, employ one or more agents to perform any act of administration, whether or not discretionary;

prosecute or defend claims, or proceedings in any jurisdiction for the protection of the estate and of the personal representative in the performance of the personal representative’s duties;

sell, mortgage, or lease any real or personal property of the estate or any interest in it for cash, credit, or for part cash and part credit, and with or without security for unpaid balances;

continue any unincorporated business or venture in which the decedent was engaged at the time of death

in the same business form for a period of not more than four months from the date of appointment of a general personal representative if continuation is a reasonable means of preserving the value of the business including good will;

in the same business form for any additional period of time that may be approved by order of the court in a formal proceeding to which the persons interested in the estate are parties; or

throughout the period of administration if the business is incorporated by the personal representative and if none of the probable distributees of the business who are competent adults object to its incorporation and retention in the estate;

incorporate any business or venture in which the decedent was engaged at the time of death;

provide for exoneration of the personal representative from personal liability in any contract entered into on behalf of the estate;

satisfy and settle claims and distribute the estate as provided in AS 13.06 — 13.36;

consider discretionary distributions to a beneficiary as being made from capital gains realized during the year.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972; am § 10 ch 64 SLA 2010)

Sec. 13.16.415.
Powers and duties of successor personal representative.

A successor personal representative has the same power and duty as the original personal representative to complete the administration and distribution of the estate, as expeditiously as possible, but the successor may not exercise any power expressly made personal to the executor named in the will.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Sec. 13.16.420.
Co-representatives; when joint action required.

If two or more persons are appointed co-representatives and unless the will provides otherwise, the concurrence of all is required on all acts connected with the administration and distribution of the estate. This restriction does not apply when any co-representative receives and gives a receipt for property due the estate, when the concurrence of all cannot readily be obtained in the time reasonably available for emergency action necessary to preserve the estate, or when a co-representative has been delegated to act for the others. Persons dealing with a co-representative, if actually unaware that another has been appointed to serve or if advised by the personal representative with whom they deal that the personal representative has authority to act alone for any of the reasons mentioned herein, are as fully protected as if the person with whom they dealt had been the sole personal representative.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972; am § 15 ch 56 SLA 1973)

Sec. 13.16.425.
Powers of surviving personal representative.

Unless the terms of the will provide otherwise, every power exercisable by personal co-representatives may be exercised by the one or more remaining after the appointment of one or more is terminated, and if one of two or more nominated as co-executors is not appointed, those appointed may exercise all the powers incident to the office.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Sec. 13.16.430.
Compensation of personal representative.

A personal representative is entitled to reasonable compensation for services.
If a will provides for compensation of the personal representative and there is no contract with the decedent regarding compensation, the personal representative may renounce the provision before qualifying and be entitled to reasonable compensation.
A personal representative also may renounce the right to all or any part of the compensation.
A written renunciation of fee may be filed with the court.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Sec. 13.16.435.
Expenses in estate litigation.

If any personal representative or person nominated as personal representative defends or prosecutes any proceeding in good faith, whether successful or not, that person is entitled to receive from the estate necessary expenses and disbursements including reasonable attorney fees incurred.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Sec. 13.16.440.
Review of employment of agents and other persons and compensation of personal representatives and other persons.

After notice to all interested persons or on petition of an interested person or on appropriate motion if administration is supervised, the propriety of employment of any person by a personal representative including any attorney, auditor, investment advisor, or other specialized agent or assistant, the reasonableness of the compensation of any person so employed, or the reasonableness of the compensation determined by the personal representative for the personal representative’s services, may be reviewed by the court.
Any person who has received excessive compensation from an estate for services rendered may be ordered to make appropriate refunds.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)